Washington statutes.
RCW 16.72.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

"Director" means director of agriculture.

"Department" means department of agriculture.

"Person" includes any individual, firm corporation, trust, association, copartnership, society, or other organization of individuals and any other business unit, device or arrangement.

"Fur farming" means breeding, raising and rearing of mink, marten, fox and chinchilla in captivity or enclosures.

[ 1955 c 321 s 2.]